Nebraska, session 109, LB799.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB799 LB799
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Service Contract Reporting Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Service Contract Reporting Act:
(1) City means a city of the metropolitan class;
(2) County means a county in this state with a population of more
than five hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent
federal decennial census;
(3) Division means the materiel division of the Department of
Administrative Services;
(4) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of
Nebraska in which:
(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at
least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period; and
(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more
for the federal census tract in the area;
(5) Fiscal year means the twelve-month period used by the city,
county, or state agency for budgeting purposes;
(6) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1,
2026;
(7) Service contract means a contract awarded by a city, county, or
state agency for the provision of legal services, accounting services,
financial consulting services, management consulting services, health
care services, engineering services, architectural services, information
technology services, marketing and advertising services, human resources
consulting services, environmental consulting services, educational and
training services, snow removal and hauling services, janitorial
services, custodial and cleaning services, yard maintenance services, or
-2-

LB799 LB799
2026 2026
tree removal services;
(8) State agency means any agency, board, or commission of this
state other than the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges,
the courts, the Legislature, or any officer or state agency established
by the Constitution of Nebraska; and
(9) State aid means:
(a) For both cities and counties, state aid paid pursuant to
sections 60-3,202 and 77-3523;
(b) For cities, state aid to cities paid pursuant to sections
39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance premium tax
paid to cities; and
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections
60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and
reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section
29-3933.
Sec. 3. On or before August 1, 2026, and on or before August 1 of
each year thereafter, each city, county, and state agency shall submit a
report to the division containing the following information:
(1) The name and address of each individual or entity that was
awarded a service contract during the most recently completed fiscal year
and the type of service involved in each such contract;
(2) The total dollar value of service contracts awarded during the
most recently completed fiscal year;
(3) The total dollar value of service contracts awarded during the
most recently completed fiscal year to an individual or entity located
within an economic redevelopment area or a qualified census tract; and
(4) A description of any efforts made by the city, county, or state
agency to increase the number of service contracts awarded to individuals
and entities located within economic redevelopment areas and qualified
census tracts.
Sec. 4. On or before September 1, 2026, and on or before September
-3-

LB799 LB799
2026 2026
1 of each year thereafter, the division shall compile the information
reported under section 3 of this act and shall electronically submit a
comprehensive report regarding such information to the Governor, the
Clerk of the Legislature, and the Urban Affairs Committee of the
Legislature. The division shall also make the comprehensive report
available on the website of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 5. If any city or county fails to submit an annual report to
the division as required under section 3 of this act, the division shall
send notification of the noncompliance to the governing body of the
relevant city or county and to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer
shall then suspend all distributions of state aid allocated to the city
or county until the annual report is submitted. Once the annual report
has been submitted, the city or county shall again become entitled to all
distributions of state aid, including any suspended distributions.
-4-